Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-1110.04
Accounting Division Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

The Accounting Division Revolving Fund is created. The fund shall consist of (1) accounting assessments received from state agencies, boards, and commissions, (2) interest earnings credited and transferred to the fund, (3) payments received for services rendered by the accounting division, and (4) rebate revenue transferred to the fund from certain state purchasing card programs. The fund shall be used for payment of administrative expenses of the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall be administered by the Accounting Administrator. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 1995, LB 325, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 27;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 36.
August 21, 2024
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.